Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.695

Bonds to finance conservation measures.

Financing to implement conservation measures, including fees charged by the department, may be carried out with bonds issued by the Washington economic development finance authority under chapter 43.163 RCW.

[ 2005 c 299 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 299: See note following RCW 44.39.010.